test/src/morphology/V-laeaeqdw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - lǟ’dõ: # Verb 1 'eng /est minna/fin' - full paradigm
     lǟ’dõ+V+Inf: lǟ’dõ
     lǟ’dõ+V+Ger: lǟ’dsõ
     lǟ’dõ+V+Ger: lǟ’dsõ
     lǟ’dõ+V+Sup: lǟ’mõ
     lǟ’dõ+V+Sup+Ine: lǟ’mõõs
     lǟ’dõ+V+Sup+Ela: lǟ’mõõst
     lǟ’dõ+V+Sup+Tra: lǟ’mõõks
     lǟ’dõ+V+Sup+Abe: lǟ’mõõt
     lǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lǟ’b
     lǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lǟ’tõ
     lǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lǟ’bõd
     lǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lekš
     lǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lekštõ, lekštā]
     lǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lekštõ, lekštā]
     lǟ’dõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: lǟ’
     lǟ’dõ+V+Cond+Sg3: lǟ’ks
     lǟ’dõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: li
     lǟ’dõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: li
     lǟ’dõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ligīd
     lǟ’dõ+V+Jus+Sg3: läkkõ
     lǟ’dõ+V+QuoSg3: lē’ji
     lǟ’dõ+V+ActPrfPrc: lǟ’nd
